DI-348
DIAGNOSTICS - VARIABLE GEAR RATIO STEERING

DIAS0-01

PRE-CHECK

1. VGRS SYSTEM DESCRIPTION
The VGRS (Variable Gear Ratio Steering) system controls the steering angle in accordance with the vehicle
speed. The system is controlled by the VGRS ECU which operates the VGRS actuator mounted on the steer-
ing intermediate shaft. The operating angle of the actuator is added to the steering angle of the intermediate
shaft in order to vary the turning angle of the front wheels in accordance with the vehicle speed.
When the VGRS system is operating normally, the steering wheel can be turned approximately 2.4 turns
from lock to lock, with the engine running and the vehicle stopped.
When the system detects a fault, the VGRS ECU illuminates the VGRS warning light to inform the driver that
the system is not operating.
CAUTION:
There may be conditions that will cause the steering wheel to be off center.
Refer to page DI-356 for further details.
2. DIAGNOSIS SYSTEM
(@) Inspect the battery voltage.
Battery voltage: 11 to 14V
If voltage is below 11V, recharge the battery before proceeding.
(b)  Check the warning light.
With the ignition switch ON, the light should illuminate for
2 seconds and then go out. If the light remains on after 2
seconds, check for DTCs.
HINT:
If the light does not illuminate, proceed to troubleshooting for
the VGRS warning light circuit (See page DI-424).

3. DTC CHECK (USING SST CHECK WIRE)

DLC3 ca (@ Checking DTCs using a SST check wire.

SST09843 -18040

(1) Usingthe SST, connectterminals Tc and CG of
DLC3.

(2)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
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(3)

HINT:

Read and record any DTCs from the VGRS warning
light on the combination meter. Refer to the chart on
the left for examples of a normal code and codes 11
and 21.

If the VGRS warning light does not blink any DTC codes or the
normal code, inspect the warning light circuit.

Trouble Area See page
Tc and CG terminal circuit DI-426
VGRS warning light circuit DI-424

(4)

Refer to the Diagnostic Trouble Code Chart (See
page DI-364) for DTC information.

(b) Clearing the DTCs using the SST check wire.

(1)
()

HINT:

Turn the ignition switch ON.
Using the SST, connect terminals Ts and CG of
DLCS3.

09843-18040
Disconnect and connect the SST check wire from
the CG terminal 4 times or more in 8 seconds.
Check that the VGRS warning light blinks a normal
code.

If the fault has not been repaired, the code may still be dis-

played.
(5)
(6)
(7)

HINT:

Turn the ignition switch OFF.

Remove the SST check wire from DLCS.

Perform the zero point calibration for the decelera-
tion sensor and yaw rate sensor (See page
DI-185).

When clearing the VGRS codes, the deceleration sensor and
yaw rate sensor memory is also cleared. Therefore it is neces-
sary to complete the zero point calibration (See page DI-185).
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Hand-held
Tester

HINT:

rosazs| tails.

5. DATALIST

(b) Clearingthe DTCs usingthe hand
(1) Connectthe hand
)
3)

HINT:

Refertothe hand

tails.

(3)

Refertothe hand

4. DTCCHECK (USINGHAND
(@) Checking DTCs usingthe Hand
(1) Connectthe hand

()

-HELD TESTER)

—heldtester.

—heldtesterto DLCS.

Turn the ignition switch ON.
Read the DTCs following the prompts on the tester

screen.

-heldtester operator's manual for further de-

—-heldtester.

—heldtesterto DLCS.

Turn the ignition switch ON.
Erase the DTCs following the prompts on the tester

screen.

-heldtester operator's manualforfurther de-

Withthehand -heldtester connectedto DLC3 andtheignitionturned ON,the VGRS datalistcanbe dis-
played. Follow the prompts on the tester screen to access the Data List.

Item

Measurement Iltem /
Range (Display)

Normal Condition

Diagnostic Note

STEERINGPOS 1

Steeringsensor 1 reading/
min.: -1862deg, 1877deg

-1682to 1877deg

Turn the steering wheel changes
the value

STEERING POS2

Steering sensor 2 reading /
min.: -1862deg, 1877deg

-1682to 1877deg

Turn the steering wheel changes
the value

Turn the steering wheel switches

km/h

STRSENS 1 Steeringsensor 1 /HIGH orLOW High or Low )
high or low
Turn the steeri heel switch

STR SENS2 Steering sensor 2 / HIGH or LOW High or Low drn the steering wheel switches
high or low
Turn the steeri heel switch

STR SENSS3 Steering sensor 3 / HIGH or LOW High or Low drn the steering wheel switches
high or low

Speed sensor reading / I
: . Speed indicated on
SPD (VSC) min.: 0km/h, max.: 255 Actual vehicle speed P

speedometer

WHEEL SPD RR

Wheel speed sensor (RR)
reading/min.: 0km/h,
max.: 255 km/h

Actual vehicle speed

Speed indicated on
speedometer

WHEEL SPD RL

Wheel speed sensor (RL)
reading/min.: 0km/h,
max.: 255 km/h

Actual vehicle speed

Speed indicated on
speedometer

ENGINEREV (RPM)

Revolutionsensar. , LESS
300 or MORE 300

Less than 300

Engine stop

More than 300

Engine running

Motor power source actual

Lessthan 10 A

When notturningthe steering

min.:0A, max.. 127.5A

MTR SQU.CUR current / min..Q. A, max.: wheel
127.5A Less than 60 A When turning the steering wheel
Estimated motor power Lessthan 10 A When not turning the steering
MTRSOUCUBEST saurceactual cutrent wheel

Less than 60 A

When turning the steering wheel

PIG source voltage / min.:

PIG SOURCE VOL 0V, max.: 22.5V 9to 16 V IG switch ON (Engine stop)
IG SOURCE VOL {f\ri(;l;(rcgz\/%ﬂsge /min.. 0 9to 16V IG switch ON (Engine stop)
LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)
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MTRCUREST.

Motor estimation current
min:: 0 A, max:: 175"

Lessthan 10 A

When not turning the steering
wheel

Less than 60 A

When turning the steering wheel

Terminal voltage U / min.:

Turn the steering wheel changes
the value

TERMINAL VOL U 0V, max.:25.5V Oto 16V (When the engine running and
VGRS system operates)
Turn the steering wheel changes
Terminal voltage V / min.: the value
TERMINAL VOL V 0V, max.: 25.5V 0to 16V (When the engine running and
VGRS system operates)
Turn the steering wheel changes
Terminal voltage W / min.: the value
TERMINAL VOL W 0V, max.:25.5V Oto 16V (When the engine running and
VGRS system operates)
Turn the steering wheel changes
Actuator position / min.: the value
ACTUATOR POS -286deg, max.: 288deg ~28610288deg (When the engine running and
VGRS warning light goes off)
Motor revolution angle ;i?/;?f:teermg wheel changes
MTRREVANGU sensoroutput UHIGH or High or Low . .
LOW (When the engine running and
VGRS warning light goes off)
Motor revolution angle ;i?/;?f:teermg wheel changes
MTR REV ANG V sensor output V HIGH or High or Low . .
LOW (When the engine running and
VGRS warning light goes off)
Motor revolution angle ;i:‘/;?j:’tee”ng wheel changes
MTRREVANGW sensoroutput WHIGH or High or Low , _
LOW (When the engine running and
VGRS warning light goes off)
Steering wheel angle ve- ;i?/;?f:teermg wheel changes
STR ANG VEL locity/min.: -1862deg, -1862to 1877 deg/sec. _ _
max.: 1877 deg/sec (When the engine running and
. ) VGRS warning light goes off)
Lock motor output voltage . :
LOCK OUTPUT VOL /min.: 0V, max.: 22.5V 9to 16V IG switch ON (Engine stop)
Thermistor temperature /
THERMISTORTEMP min.: =50 ° C, max.: 205 -50t0205 °C When the VGRS system operates
°C
Actuator target angle /
ACTTARGETANGL min.: -286 deg, max.: 288 -286t0288deg Whenthe VGRS system operate
deg
Actuator revolution speed /
ACT REV SPD min.: —-1862deg, max.: -1862to 1877 deg/sec. Whenthe VGRS system operates
1877 deg/sec.
Command value DUTY /
DUTY VAL min.:0%, max.. 100% 0to 100% When the VGRS system operates
Command value DUTY for
LOCK DUTY VAL actuatorlock control/min.: Lessthan 10% IG switchON
0%,max.. 100%
Straight steering angle val- Immediately after connecting the
*
STRAIGHTANGFLG id flag / INVALID or VALID VALID or INVALID battery terminal
Actuator deviation angle /
ACT DEV ANGL min.: —286 deg, max.: 288 -286t0288deg Whenthe VGRS system operates

deg

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP
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ACT TEMP EST

Actuator estimation tem-
perature / min.: =50 °C,
max.: 205 °C

-501t0 205 °C

MTR OVERHEAT *2

Record of continuous over-
heat preventive control /
Rec or Unrec

Rec or Unrec -

MTR LOW POWER *2

Record of low motor power
source voltage / Rec or
Unrec

Rec or Unrec -

MTR HIGH POWER *2

Record of high motor pow-
er source voltage / Rec or
Unrec

Rec or Unrec -

FLO MALFUNCTION *2

Record of wheel speed
malfunction (left) / Rec or
Unrec

Rec or Unrec -

FRO MALFUNCTION *2

Record of wheel speed
malfunction (right) / Rec or
Unrec

Rec or Unrec -

Test mode / NORMAL or

NORMAL : Normal mode

TEST MODE TEST TEST : During test mode -
Number of DTC recorded / . .

#CODES min.: 0, max.: 255 Min.: 0, max.: 39 -

*1: NOTICE:

This data must read valid before proceeding with any steering adjustments. If invalid, perform steer-
ing angle sensor initialization procedure, or if VGRS actuator or VGRS ECU has been replaced, per-
form VGRS system calibration (steering angle adjust).

*2: HINT:

When Rec is listed, reset to Unrec by going to the VGRS menu on the hand—-held tester, select records clear-

ance, and follow the prompts.
6. FREEZE FRAME DATA

The VGRS ECU stores memorized data when a trouble code is set and can be viewed using the hand-held

When the VGRS system operates

tester.
Hand-held tester display Measurement ltem Value
STEERING POS 1 Steering position 1 (parallel) -1862 to 1877
SPD (VSC) Vehicle speed (VSC ECU) Speed indicated on speedometer
ENGINE REV (RPM) Engine revolution Less than 300 or More than 300
MTR SOURCE CUR Motor power source actual current 0to 127.5
MTR SOU CUR EST The estimated motor current 0to 127.5
PIG SOURCE VOL PIG-power source voltage 0to 22.5
IG SOURCE VOL IG—power source voltage 0to 22.5
ACTUATOR POS Actuator position —-286 to 288
STR ANGLE VEL Steering wheel angle velocity -1862to 1877
LOCK OUTPUT VOL Lock motor output voltage 0to 22.5
ACT TARGET ANGLE Actuator target angle —286to 288
ACT REV SPD Actuator revolution speed -1862to 1877
DUTY VAL Command value DUTY 0to 100
LOCK DUTY VAL Command value DUTY for actuator lock control |0 to 100
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7. VGRS SENSOR SIGNAL CHECK (TEST MODE)
HINT:

(] Before entering Test Mode, check and repair any current
VGRS DTCs.

.1 When entering test mode, the 4 sensor check DTCs are
recorded at once. When the ECU judges the sensor nor-
mal during the test procedure, the DTC will be eliminated.

(@) Procedure for Sensor Test Mode using a SST check wire.
SST 09843-18040
(1) Make sure the ignition switch is OFF.
(2) Usingthe SST check wire, connect terminals Ts and
CG of DLC3.
(3) Turn the ignition switch ON.

(4) Check that the VGRS warning light is blinking.
HINT:
If the VGRS warning light does not blink, inspect the warning
light or Ts terminal circuits.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

Trouble Area See page
Ts and CG terminal circuit DI-428
VGRS warning light circuit DI-424
(5) Start the engine.
(6) Turn the steering wheel lock to lock.
NOTICE:
. Check for any unusual feeling in the steering wheel
operation.

. Slowly turn the steering wheel from lock to lock.
check that it rotates approximately 2.4 turns.

HINT:

«  The warning light display has no change.

. If the actuator moving amount is correctly checked, the
diagnostic codes C1575/75 and C1576/76 in the test
mode are cleared.
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(7) Drive the vehicle at more than 10 km/h (6 mph) for
15 to 30 seconds.
HINT:
If the vehicle speed sensor is correctly checked, the diagnostic
codes C1571/71 and C1572/72 in the test mode are cleared.

HINT: The situation of VGRS warning light when driving.

ON - T A
State 1 OFF The light is put out by 10 km/h or more. i
4Hz innkings E | 4Hz blinking
ON .- ! . — g
! llluminate
2 | L
State OFF ____1_ i I o | L 1
4Hz blinking | ! i 4Hz blinking
ON Al
State 3 OFF 5 E The light is put out by 4 km/h or more. i
4Hz blinking! | ' 4Hz blinking
1 i I
(km/h) A b !
10 ! |
i |
Vehicle Speed /N o
0 Hour

State 1: If either DTC C1575/75 or C1576/76 is abnormal, the warning light remains on between 4 and
10 km/h after first starting.

State 2: If a speed sensor DTC is detected at 10 km/h or above, the warning light will remain on until
vehicle speed is less than 4 km/h.

State 3: Warning light pattern when all sensors are normal.

G20187 F17862

(8) Stop the vehicle. Leave the engine running.

(9) Usingthe SST check wire, connect the 3rd terminal
of the SST check wire to terminal Tc of DLCS3.
SST 09843-18040

DLC3 CG

JREELEOT,
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(10) Read the number of blinks of the VGRS warning
light. (Refer to the chart below)

HINT:

. If all wheel speed sensors are normal, the normal blinking
code is output. (A repeating cycle of 0.25 sec. ON and
0.25 sec. OFF)

. If 2 or more faults are detected at the same time, the low-
est number will be displayed first.

Malfunction Code (Example Code 72 76)
7 2 7 6
s ~ s N ~ ’ A ~
ON

FF s MUMWL__

© 1.5 sec. 2.5 sec. 4 sec.
o e
0.5 sec. 0.5 sec. S oeneat

0.5 sec. 0.5 sec. Repeat
BR3893

(11) After completing the check, disconnect the SST
from DLC3 and turn the ignition OFF.
(b) Procedure for Sensor Test Mode using the hand-held
tester.
(1) Connect the hand—held tester.
(2)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
(3) Complete the VGRS Test Mode following the
prompts on the tester screen.
HINT:
Refer to the hand—held tester operator’s manual for further de-
tails.
(4) Readthe DTCs.
(5) After completing the test, disconnect the tester and
turn the ignition switch OFF.
DTC of VGRS sensor check function:

Code No. Diagnosis Trouble Area

e Left front speed sensor
C1571/71 Vehicle speed sensor malfunction (FLO)  Sensor installation
* Sensor rotor

* Right front speed sensor
C1572/72 Vehicle speed sensor malfunction (FRO) eSensor installation
» Sensor rotor

« Steering sensor

C1575/75 Steering angle sensor malfunction . .
* Sensor installation

C1576/ 76 DC motor revolution sensor malfunction * VGRS actuator
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